Mississippi, session 2026, HB1839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The governing authorities of the City of Natchez, Mississippi, are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to contribute an amount not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) each fiscal year to Natchez, Inc., a Mississippi nonprofit corporation organized for economic development purposes. SECTION 2.  The Board of Supervisors of Adams County, Mississippi, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to contribute an amount not less than One Hundred Sixty-five Thousand Dollars ($165,000.00) each fiscal year to Natchez, Inc., a Mississippi nonprofit corporation organized for economic development purposes. SECTION 3.  This act shall be repealed from and after July 1, 2030. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.